Utah statutes.
78B-12-106.   Ward of state -- Natural or adoptive parent has primary obligation to support -- Right of third party to recover support.

(1)  A natural or an adoptive parent whose minor child has become a ward of this or any other state is not relieved of the primary obligation to support that child until the child reaches the age of majority, regardless of any agreements or legal defenses that may exist between the parents or other care providers.  Any state that provides support for a child shall have the right to reimbursement.

(2)  Nothing contained in this chapter may act to relieve the natural parent or adoptive parent of the primary obligation of support.

(3)  A third party has the same right to recover support from the natural or adoptive parent as a custodial parent.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

